Utah statutes.
4-24-21.   Brand inspection fees.

The department with the approval of the Livestock Brand Board may set and collect a fee for the issuance of any certificate of brand inspection.  Brand inspection fees incurred for the inspection of such animals at a livestock market may be withheld by the market and paid from the proceeds derived from their sale.  The fee shall be determined by the department pursuant to Subsection 4-2-2(2).

